Hawaii statutes.
§442-3 Board of examiners. There shall
be a board to be known as the "state board of chiropractic examiners",
that shall consist of five members. Three members of the board shall be
licensees under this chapter and two shall be public members. As used in this
chapter, "board" means the state board of chiropractic examiners.

No person connected with any chiropractic
school or college is eligible to appointment as a member of the board. Each
member licensed under this chapter shall have practiced chiropractic for at
least five years immediately prior to the date of appointment. [L 1925, c 99,
§1; RL 1935, §961; RL 1945, §2072; am L 1949, c 57, §2; RL 1955, §60-3; am L Sp
1959 2d, c 1, §§5, 15; am L 1963, c 114, §3; HRS §442-3; am L 1978, c 208, §3;
am L 1982, c 204, §8; am L 1984, c 240, §3 and c 243, §1; am L 1992, c 202,
§55; am L 1993, c 322, §4]

Cross References

Departmental organization and administration, see §26-9.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next